lt-LT: Transporto priemonės valstybinio numerio rėmelio profilis: Tik apatinė juosta; Visas kraštas; Plonas profilis; Standartinis profilis; Suderinamas su lipdukų išpjovomis; Tik viršutinė juosta; Platus profilis; Kita
nl: Voertuigkentekenplaathouder profiel: Alleen onderrand; Volledige rand; Slank profiel; Standaardprofiel; Compatibel met stickeruitsparing; Alleen bovenrand; Breed profiel; Overig
pt-BR: Moldura de placa veicular perfil: Apenas faixa inferior; Borda completa; Perfil fino; Perfil padrão; Compatível com recorte de adesivo; Apenas faixa superior; Perfil largo; Outro
es: Perfil del marco de la placa de identificación del vehículo: Solo franja inferior; Borde completo; Perfil delgado; Perfil estándar; Compatible con el recorte para la pegatina; Solo franja superior; Perfil ancho; Otro
hr-HR: Profil okvira registarske pločice vozila: Samo donja traka; Puni obrub; Tanki profil; Standardni profil; Usklađeno s izrezom za naljepnicu; Samo gornja traka; Široki profil; Ostalo
ru: Профиль рамки номерного знака: Только нижняя полоса; Полная рамка; Тонкий профиль; Стандартный профиль; С вырезом для наклейки; Только верхняя полоса; Широкий профиль; Другое
hu: Jármű rendszámtábla-keret profilja: Csak alsó sávos; Teljes keret; Vékony profil; Normál profil; Matricakivágással kompatibilis; Csak felső sávos; Széles profil; Egyéb
zh-CN: 车牌框边框样式: 仅底部条框; 全包边; 细边框; 标准边框; 符合贴纸开口要求; 仅顶部条框; 宽边框; 其他
th: รูปทรงกรอบป้ายทะเบียนรถยนต์: แถบด้านล่างเท่านั้น; ขอบเต็ม; ขอบบาง; ขอบมาตรฐาน; รองรับรอยตัดสติกเกอร์; แถบด้านบนเท่านั้น; ขอบกว้าง; อื่นๆ
pl: Profil ramki tablicy rejestracyjnej pojazdu: Tylko dolna listwa; Pełne obramowanie; Cienki profil; Profil standardowy; Z wycięciami na naklejki; Tylko górna listwa; Szeroki profil; Inne
it: Profilo del telaio della targa del veicolo: Solo fascia inferiore; Bordo completo; Profilo sottile; Profilo standard; Compatibile con spazi per adesivi; Solo fascia superiore; Profilo largo; Altro
zh-TW: 車牌框輪廓: 僅下框; 全框; 窄邊框; 標準邊框; 符合貼紙裁切; 僅上框; 寬邊框; 其他
en: Vehicle license plate frame profile: Bottom-strip only; Full border; Slim profile; Standard profile; Sticker cutout compliant; Top-strip only; Wide profile; Other
sv: Fordonsregistrering – skyltsramsprofil: Endast nedre list; Hel ram; Tunn profil; Standardprofil; Anpassad för klistermärken; Endast övre list; Bred profil; Övrigt
fi: Ajoneuvon rekisterikilven kehys profiili: Vain alareuna; Koko kehys; Ohut profiili; Vakioprofiili; Tarran leikkaus huomioitu; Vain yläreuna; Leveä profiili; Muu
de: Profil des Fahrzeugkennzeichenrahmens: Nur untere Leiste; Vollständiger Rand; Schmales Profil; Standardprofil; Mit Aufkleber-Aussparung; Nur obere Leiste; Breites Profil; Sonstiges
cs: Profil rámečku registrační značky vozidla: Pouze spodní pruh; Celý okraj; Úzký profil; Standardní profil; Kompatibilní s výřezem na nálepku; Pouze horní pruh; Široký profil; Jiné
pt-PT: Perfil da placa de matrícula do veículo: Apenas faixa inferior; Margem completa; Perfil fino; Perfil padrão; Compatível com recorte de autocolante; Apenas faixa superior; Perfil largo; Outro
ko: 차량 번호판 프레임 형상: 하단 스트립 전용; 전체 테두리; 슬림형; 표준형; 스티커 컷아웃 준수; 상단 스트립 전용; 와이드형; 기타
fr: Profil du cadre de plaque d’immatriculation: Bande inférieure uniquement; Bordure complète; Profil mince; Profil standard; Compatible avec découpe pour vignette; Bande supérieure uniquement; Profil large; Autre
ro-RO: Profilul suportului plăcuței de înmatriculare auto: Doar bandă inferioară; Cadru complet; Profil subțire; Profil standard; Decupaj compatibil cu autocolantele; Doar bandă superioară; Profil lat; Altele
sk-SK: Profil rámčeka evidenčného čísla vozidla: Iba spodný pásik; Úplný okraj; Tenký profil; Štandardný profil; S výrezom na nálepku; Iba horný pásik; Široký profil; Iné
tr: Araç plaka çerçevesi profili: Sadece alt şerit; Tam kenarlık; İnce profil; Standart profil; Çıkartma kesitine uygun; Sadece üst şerit; Geniş profil; Diğer
bg-BG: Профил на рамката за регистрационна табела: Само долна лента; Пълна рамка; Тънък профил; Стандартен профил; Съвместим с изрезки за стикери; Само горна лента; Широк профил; Друго
da: Profil for nummerpladeramme: Kun nederste stribe; Fuld kant; Slank profil; Standardprofil; Kompatibel med mærkatudskæring; Kun øverste stribe; Bred profil; Andet
sl-SI: Profil okvirja registrske tablice vozila: Samo spodnji trak; Polna obroba; Tanek profil; Standarden profil; Združljivo z izrezom za nalepke; Samo zgornji trak; Širok profil; Drugo
nb: Rammeprofil for kjøretøysnummerskilt: Kun nederste kant; Full ramme; Slank profil; Standardprofil; Kompatibel med klistremerkeutsnitt; Kun øverste kant; Bred profil; Annet
ja: 車両用ライセンスプレートフレーム形状: 下部ストリップのみ; フルボーダー; スリムプロファイル; 標準プロファイル; ステッカー切り抜き対応; 上部ストリップのみ; ワイドプロファイル; その他
vi: Hình dạng khung biển số xe: Chỉ có viền dưới; Viền toàn bộ; Viền mỏng; Viền tiêu chuẩn; Có khoảng trống dán tem; Chỉ có viền trên; Viền rộng; Khác
el: Προφίλ πλαισίου πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας οχήματος: Μόνο κάτω λωρίδα; Πλήρες περίγραμμα; Λεπτό προφίλ; Κανονικό προφίλ; Συμβατό με εγκοπή αυτοκόλλητου; Μόνο επάνω λωρίδα; Πλατύ προφίλ; Άλλο